Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The State Parks and Recreation Department shall allow for  the installa-
tion and service of public electric vehicle  charging stations in parking spaces that are part
of the facilities of the system  of state parks, including parks, park facilities, ocean shores,
scenic waterways, trails and historic sites throughout the State of Oregon.
(2) The department shall implement subsection (1) of this section in a manner that:
(a) Is consistent with the goals set forth in ORS 283.398; and
(b) Takes into consideration:
(A) The recommendations in the report required by ORS 283.401;
(B) The availability of  infrastructure to deliver electricity to electric vehicle charging
stations in the parking spaces described in subsection (1) of this section; and
(C) Opportunities to contract with third-party entities.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Parks and Recreation Transportation Electrification  Fund is estab-
lished in the State Treasury, separate and  distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned
by the Parks and Recreation Transportation Electrification Fund  shall be credited to the
fund. Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the State Parks  and Recreation
Department to carry out section 1 of this 2021 Act.
(2) The department may seek out  and receive gifts, grants, contributions, bequests or
other donations of any kind from any public or private  source for use in carrying out the
purposes of section 1 of this 2021 Act. Moneys received under this subsection shall be de-
posited in the Parks and Recreation Transportation Electrification Fund.
SECTION 3.
ORS 757.357 is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 757.
SECTION 4.  ORS 757.357 is amended to read:
757.357. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Electric company” has the meaning given that term in ORS 757.600.
(b)(A) “Infrastructure measures” includes,  but is not limited to, investments in, expenses
related to or rebates for:
(i) Distribution system infrastructure that supports transportation electrification;
(ii) Communication and control technologies that support  transportation electrification;
and
(iii) Behind the meter infrastructure that supports transportation electrification and  is
owned by an electric company or by a customer.
Enrolled House Bill 2290 (HB 2290-A) Page 1
(B) “Infrastructure measures” does not include investments in or expenses related to
education and outreach activities related to transportation electrification, or other trans-
portation electrification-related activities determined by the Public Utility Commission  to be
separate and distinct from the development of infrastructure.
(c) “Retail electricity consumer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 757.600.
[(b)] (d) “Transportation electrification” means:
(A) The use of electricity from external sources to provide power to all or part of a vehicle;
(B) Programs related to developing the use of electricity for the purpose described in subpara-
graph (A) of this paragraph; [ and]
(C) Infrastructure [ investments] measures  related to developing the use  of electricity for the
purpose described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph[ .]; and
(D) Programs related to supporting the adoption and  service of vehicles powered as de-
scribed in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.
[(c)] (e)  “Vehicle” means a vehicle, vessel, train, boat or any other equipment that is mobile.
(2) The Legislative Assembly finds and declares that:
(a) Transportation electrification is necessary  to reduce petroleum use, achieve optimum levels
of energy efficiency and  carbon reduction, meet federal and state air quality standards, meet this
state’s greenhouse gas emissions reduction goals described in ORS  468A.205 and improve the public
health and safety;
(b) Widespread transportation electrification requires  that electric companies increase access
to the use of electricity as a transportation fuel;
(c) Widespread  transportation electrification requires that electric companies increase access to
the use of electricity as a transportation fuel in low and moderate income communities;
(d) Widespread transportation electrification should stimulate innovation and  competition, pro-
vide consumers with increased options in the use of charging equipment and in procuring  services
from suppliers of electricity, attract private capital investments and create high  quality jobs in this
state;
(e) Transportation electrification and the purchase and use  of electric vehicles should assist in
managing the electrical grid, integrating generation from  renewable energy resources and improving
electric system efficiency and operational flexibility, including the ability of an electric  company to
integrate variable generating resources;
(f) Deploying transportation electrification and electric vehicles creates the opportunity for  an
electric company to propose, to the [ Public Utility ] commission,  that a net benefit for the customers
of the electric company is attainable; and
(g) Charging  electric vehicles in a manner that provides benefits to electrical grid management
affords fuel cost savings for vehicle drivers.
(3) The [ Public Utility ] commission shall direct each electric company to file  applications, in a
form and manner prescribed by the commission, for programs to [ accelerate] support transportation
electrification. A program proposed by an electric company may include prudent investments  in or
customer rebates for electric vehicle charging and related infrastructure.
(4) The commission may allow an electric company to recover costs from retail  electric-
ity consumers for prudent  infrastructure measures to support transportation electrification
if the infrastructure measures are consistent with and meet the requirements of subsection
(5) of this section.
(5) If undertaken by an electric company,  an infrastructure measure to support trans-
portation electrification is a  utility service and a benefit to utility customers if the
infrastructure measure can be reasonably anticipated to:
(a) Support reductions of transportation sector greenhouse gas  emissions over time; and
(b) Benefit the electric  company’s customers in ways that may include, but need not be
limited to:
(A) Distribution or transmission management benefits;
Enrolled House Bill 2290 (HB 2290-A) Page 2
(B) Revenues to utilities from electric vehicle charging to offset utilities’ fixed costs  that
may otherwise be charged to customers;
(C) System efficiencies or other economic values inuring  to the benefit of customers over
the long term; or
(D) Increased customer choice through greater  transportation electrification
infrastructure deployment to increase availability of and access to public  and private electric
vehicle charging stations.
[(4)] (6) When considering  a transportation electrification program and determining cost recov-
ery for investments and other expenditures  that are not infrastructure measures and that are
related to a program proposed  by an electric company under subsection (3) of this section, the
commission shall consider whether the investments and other expenditures:
(a) Are within the service territory of the electric company;
(b) Are prudent as determined by the commission;
(c) Are reasonably expected to be used and useful as determined by the commission;
(d) Are reasonably expected to enable the electric company to support the electric company’s
electrical system;
(e) Are reasonably expected to improve the electric company’s electrical system efficiency  and
operational flexibility, including the ability of the  electric company to integrate variable generating
resources;  and
(f) Are reasonably expected to stimulate innovation, competition and customer  choice in electric
vehicle charging and related infrastructure and services.
(7) In undertaking infrastructure measures  that involve the installation of one or more
electric vehicle charging stations, an electric company  must allow for customer choice in the
selection of the  type of electric vehicle charging station to be installed, subject to equipment
eligibility as determined by the electric company. An electric  company may prequalify mul-
tiple types of eligible electric vehicle charging stations based  on criteria determined by the
electric company.
(8) Nothing in this section restricts or prohibits a corporation,  company, partnership,
individual or association of individuals exempt from regulation  under ORS 757.005 (1)(b)(G)
from furnishing electricity to any number of customers for use in motor vehicles.
[(5)(a)] (9)(a)  Tariff schedules and rates allowed pursuant  to [ subsection (3) ] subsections (3) to
(6) of this section:
(A) May allow a return of and  a return on an investment made by an electric company under
[subsection (3) ] subsections (3) to (6)  of this section; and
(B) Shall be recovered from [ all customers ] the retail electricity consumers  of an electric
company in a manner [ that is similar to the  recovery of distribution system investments ] determined
by the commission .
(b) A return on investment allowed under this subsection may be earned for  a period of time
that does not exceed the depreciation schedule of  the investment approved by the commission. When
an electric company’s investment is fully depreciated, the  commission may authorize the electric
company to donate the electric vehicle charging infrastructure to the owner of  the property on
which the infrastructure is located.
[(6)] (10)  For purposes of  ORS 757.355, electric vehicle charging infrastructure provides utility
service to the customers of an electric company.
[(7)] (11)  In authorizing programs described in subsection (3) of this section, the commission
shall review data  concerning current and future adoption of electric vehicles and utilization of
electric vehicle charging infrastructure. If market  barriers unrelated to the investment  or expend-
itures made by an  electric company prevent electric vehicles from adequately utilizing available
electric vehicle charging infrastructure, the commission  may not permit additional investments in
or expenditures related to supporting  transportation electrification without a reasonable  showing
that the investments  or expenditures would not result in  long-term stranded costs recoverable from
the [ customers] retail electricity consumers  of electric companies.
Enrolled House Bill 2290 (HB 2290-A) Page 3
Passed by House April 15, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 3, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2290 (HB 2290-A) Page 4